Colorado statutes. TITLE 41 Aeronautics: Aircraft and Airports
ARTICLE 1
AERONAUTICS ACT OF 1937

Section

41-1-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Aeronautics Act of 1937".

Source:

L. 37:

p. 250, § 1.

CSA:

C. 17, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-1.

Cross references:

For use of an aircraft in hunting wildlife, see § 33-6-124; for the establishment of the Colorado division of civil air patrol within the department of military and veterans affairs, see § 28-1-101.

41-1-102. Interpretation.

This article shall be so interpreted and construed as to effect its general purpose and to make uniform the law of those states which enact it and to harmonize, as far as possible, with federal laws and regulations on the subject of aeronautics.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 254, § 13.

CSA:

C. 17, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-8.

41-1-103. Navigation of aircraft.

The public safety requiring and the advantages of uniform regulation making it desirable in the interest of aeronautical progress that aircraft operating within this state should conform with respect to design, construction, and airworthiness to the standards prescribed by the United States government with respect to navigation of aircraft subject to its jurisdiction, it is unlawful for any person to navigate an aircraft within the state unless it is licensed and registered by the department of commerce of the United States in the manner prescribed by the lawful rules and regulations of the United States government then in force.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 251, § 3.

CSA:

C. 17, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-2.

41-1-104. License for navigation.

The public safety requiring and the advantages of uniform regulations making it desirable in the interest of aeronautical progress that a person engaging within this state in navigating aircraft designated in section 41-1-103 in any form of navigation for which license to operate such aircraft would be required by the United States government shall have the qualifications necessary for obtaining and holding the class of license required by the United States government. It is unlawful for any person to engage in operating such aircraft within this state in any form of navigation unless he has such a license.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 251, § 4.

CSA:

C. 17, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-3.

41-1-105. Display of license.

The certificate of the license shall be kept in the personal possession of the licensee when he is operating aircraft within this state, and must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, any official of the United States department of commerce, any peace officer of this state, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any airport or landing field in this state upon which he lands.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 251, § 5.

CSA:

C. 17, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-4.

41-1-106. Sovereignty in space in state.

Sovereignty in the space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to rest in the state, except where assumed by United States law.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 251, § 6.

CSA:

C. 17, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-5.

41-1-107. Ownership of space.

The ownership of space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to be vested in the several owners of the surface beneath, subject to the right of flight of aircraft.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 251, § 7.

CSA:

C. 17, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-6.

Cross references:

For estates above the surface, see article 32 of title 38.

41-1-108. Penalty for violation.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 251, § 12.

CSA:

C. 17, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 5-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 5-1-7.